Hawaii statutes.
§635-27 Examination for cause. Each
party shall have the right, under the direction of the court, to examine a
proposed juror as to the proposed juror's qualifications, interest, or bias
that would affect the trial of the cause and as to any matter that might tend
to affect the proposed juror's verdict. Each party may introduce competent
evidence to show the disqualification, interest, or bias of any juror. [L 1905,
c 5, §1; RL 1925, §2416; am L 1931, c 294, §1; RL 1935, §3734; RL 1945, §10110;
RL 1955, §231-10; HRS §635-27; am L 1972, c 89, §2B(h); gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Grounds for disqualification, see §§612-4 and 612-5.

Rules of Court

See HRCP rule 47(a); HRPP rule 24(a).

Case Notes

Prospective juror must be challenged for cause before juror
is sworn. 5 H. 634 (1886).

Statement of juror though not sworn may be relied upon. 9 H.
622 (1895).

Refusal to sustain challenges for proper cause may result in
reversible error. 23 H. 792 (1917).

Examination of prospective jurors upon voir dire party
entitled to ask questions which will aid judge in determining whether juror
should be excused for cause and also, within reasonable limits, all questions
which may enlighten attorney upon question whether attorney should exercise
peremptory challenges. 32 H. 543 (1932).

Court's refusal to allow voir dire inquiries into specific
possible prejudices of prospective jurors upheld as within discretion. 57 H.
492, 559 P.2d 728 (1977).

Cited: 20 H. 7, 15 (1910).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next